Hawaii statutes.
[§179D-23] Injunctive relief. Whenever
in the judgment of the department any person has engaged in or is about to engage
in any act or practice that constitutes or will constitute an unlawful action
under this chapter, the department may apply to the circuit environmental court
of the county in which the unlawful act or practice has been or is about to be
engaged in, or in which jurisdiction is appropriate, for an order enjoining the
act or practice, or for an order requiring compliance with this chapter. Upon
a showing by the department that a person has engaged in or is about to engage
in any unlawful act or practice, a permanent or temporary injunction,
restraining order, or other order shall be granted without the necessity of
showing lack of an adequate remedy at law. [L 2007, c 262, pt of §1; L 2014, c
218, §8]

Previous
Vol03_Ch0121-0200D
Next